Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-646
Peace officer, defined.

Peace officer shall mean any town marshal, chief of police, local police officer, sheriff, or deputy sheriff, the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety, or any officer of the Nebraska State Patrol and shall also include members of the National Guard on active service by direction of the Governor during periods of emergency or civil disorder and Game and Parks Commission conservation officers while in areas under the control of the Game and Parks Commission. With respect to directing traffic only, peace officer shall also include any person authorized to direct or regulate traffic.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 142;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 405.